Utah statutes.
61-1-108.   Notice of contents of this part -- May not waive -- Nonexclusive.

(1)  An employer who is licensed under this chapter shall post a notice and use other appropriate means to inform an employee of rights, protections, and obligations under this part.

(2)  An individual may not waive a right or protection provided by this part by agreement, policy form, or condition of employment, including by a predispute arbitration agreement.

(3)  This part may not be considered to diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies of a reporter under federal or state law, or under any collective bargaining agreement.

